Hawaii statutes.
§674-20 No implied liability or award.
In no case shall any liability be implied against the State, and no award shall
be made against the State on any claim brought under this part except upon
legal evidence that would establish liability against an individual or
corporation. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351, §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next